Massachusetts, session 194th, H3095.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out the words “seven hundred dollars”, in lines 195, 218 and 240,
and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the figure:— $1,500.
of 1